Utah statutes.
70A-4a-501.   Variation by agreement and effect of funds transfer system
rule.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, rights and obligations of a
party to a funds transfer may be varied by agreement of the affected party.
(2) (a)  "Funds transfer system rule" means a rule of an association of banks:
(i)  governing transmission of payment orders by means of a funds transfer
system of the association or rights and obligations with respect to those
orders; or
(ii)  to the extent the rule governs rights and obligations between banks that
are parties to a funds transfer in which a Federal Reserve Bank, acting as an
intermediary bank, sends a payment order to the beneficiary's bank.
(b)  Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a funds transfer system
rule governing rights and obligations between participating banks using the
system may be effective even if the rule conflicts with this chapter and
indirectly affects another party to the funds transfer who does not consent to
the rule.  A funds transfer system rule may also govern rights and obligations
of parties other than participating banks using the system to the extent
stated in Subsection 70A-4a-404(3), Subsection 70A-4a-405(4), and Subsection
70A-4a-507(3).
